Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4106.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to any liability limitations provided under ORS 426.335 (6), a
peace officer may not be held criminally or civilly liable for the use of restraints on or
physical force against a person in the course of the peace officer’s transportation of the
person under ORS 426.005 to 426.390, 426.701, 427.235 to 427.292 or 430.397 to 430.401 provided
the peace officer reasonably believes the restraints or use of physical force are necessary to
protect the person, the officer or the public and the officer uses the restraints or physical
force in good faith and without malice.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 90